Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1116
Pesticide, defined.

Pesticide shall mean any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest, insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, weed, or other form of plant or animal life or virus, except viruses on or in living humans or animals, and any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 16.